New Jersey, session 222, S3667.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. a.  As used in this section: Board means the New Jersey Board of Public Utilities or any successor agency. Electric public utility means a public utility, as that term is defined pursuant to R.S.48:2-13, that transmits and distributes electricity to end users in the State. Orsted means Ørsted A/S, Orsted North America Inc., Orsted Wind Power North America LLC, Ocean Wind LLC, and Ocean Wind II, LLC. b.    Notwithstanding any law, rule, regulation, order, or agreement to the contrary, all unexpended, unencumbered, or unobligated funds received by the State from the settlement agreement with Orsted entered into as of May 25, 2024, shall be appropriated to the Board of Public Utilities.  The board shall use such funds to provide ratepayer relief to electric public utility customers. c.     The board shall adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this section by, at a minimum, establishing a timeline by which, and the form and manner in which, the board shall administer ratepayer relief to electric public utility customers pursuant to this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.